Alabama, session 2026rs, SB7.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 41-9-1022 and 41-9-1038 of the Code
Page 1

Section 1. Sections 41-9-1022 and 41-9-1038 of the Code
SB7 INTRODUCED
of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§41-9-1022
(a) This article shall not be construed to apply to any
match, contest, or exhibition of boxing or wrestling in which
the contestants are all amateurs and which is governed or
authorized by any of the following:
(1) U.S.A. Boxing.
(2) The Alabama High School Athletic Association.
(3) The National Collegiate Athletic Association.
(4) Amateur Athletic Union.
(5) Golden Gloves.
(6) USA Wrestling.
(7) The National Junior College Athletic Association.
(8) The National Association of Intercollegiate
Athletics.
(9) The National Collegiate Wrestling Association.
(10) The local affiliate of any organization listed in
this section.
(b) Nothing in this article shall be construed to
authorize any match, contest, or exhibition of slap fighting
in this state. For the purposes of this subsection, "slap
fighting" is unarmed combat consisting of two opponents who
stand at arm's length from each other and take turns slapping
each other in the face. The opponents are prohibited from
moving, flinching, or defending themselves in any way as blows
are struck."
"§41-9-1038
(a)(1) Any person may file a written and signed
Page 2

(a)(1) Any person may file a written and signed
SB7 INTRODUCED
complaint with the commission alleging that any other person
has violated any provision of Sections 41-9-1029 to through
41-9-1037, inclusive. A complaint shall be made in the manner
prescribed by the board and shall be referred by the
commission to a standing investigative committee, consisting
of a commission member, the executive director, the attorney
for the commission, and an investigator or the chief inspector
of the commission. If the investigative committee finds that
no probable cause exists, the investigative committee may
dismiss the charges and prepare a statement in writing,
detailing the reasons for the decision.
(b)(1)(2)a. If the investigative committee finds that
probable cause exists, the commission shall initiate an
administrative proceeding. If the commission determines the
person has violated any provision of Sections 41-9-1029 to
through 41-9-1037, inclusive, the commission may do any of the
following:
a.1. Issue a cease and desist order.
b.2. Suspend or revoke a license.
c.3. Impose an administrative fine of not more than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation.
(2)b. The commission may petition the circuit court of
the county where the violation occurred to enforce a cease and
desist order and to collect any assessed fine.
(b) The Attorney General may bring a civil action
requesting relief, including a permanent or temporary
injunction, restraining order, or other order, against any
person he or she believes is violating any provision of
Page 3

person he or she believes is violating any provision of
SB7 INTRODUCED
Sections 41-9-1029 through 41-9-1037.
(c)(1) Any manager, promoter, matchmaker, or licensee
who knowingly violates or coerces or causes any other person
to violate any provision of Sections 41-9-1029 through
41-9-1037 shall be guilty of a Class C felony.
(2) Any member or employee of the commission or any
person who administers or enforces this article or rules
adopted pursuant to this article who knowingly violates
Section 41-9-1033 or Section 41-9-1034 shall be guilty of a
Class C felony.
(d)(1) Any professional boxer, professional bare
knuckle boxer, tough man contestant, professional wrestler,
amateur mixed martial arts competitor, or professional
competitor in mixed martial arts who knowingly violates this
article, except Section 41-9-1034, upon conviction shall be
100 guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.
101 (2) In addition to the criminal penalties provided in
102 subdivision (1), any professional boxer, professional bare
103 knuckle boxer, tough man contestant, professional wrestler,
104 amateur mixed martial arts competitor, or professional
105 competitor in mixed martial arts who violates Section
106 41-9-1034 may be punished by a civil fine not exceeding
107 twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) together with a
108 percentage of the purse not exceeding 15 percent for each
109 violation. All fines and purse percentages imposed by this
110 subdivision shall be collected by the commission and deposited
111 into the Alabama Athletic Commission Fund established in
112 Section 41-9-1039.
Page 4

Section 41-9-1039.
SB7 INTRODUCED
113 (e) A person who participates in or promotes unarmed
114 combat without being properly authorized or licensed by the
115 commission pursuant to this article shall be guilty of a Class
116 A misdemeanor.
117 (c)(f) The criminal penalties in this section shall not
118 be construed to repeal other criminal laws. Whenever conduct
119 prescribed by this article is also prescribed by other
120 provision of law, the provision which carries the more serious
121 penalty shall be applied.
122 (d)(g) Any person aggrieved by an adverse action of the
123 commission may appeal the action to the Circuit Court of
124 Montgomery County in accordance with the Alabama
125 Administrative Procedure Act."
126 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
127 1, 2026.
Page 5